Arkansas, session 2025, HB1164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 15, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-15-103. Cognitive assessment.
(a) A physician or healthcare provider who is providing medical
treatment in this state may offer annually a cognitive assessment of a
patient for cognitive function, Alzheimer's disease, or dementia if the
patient is:
(1) Sixty (60) years of age or older; or
(2) Forty-five (45) years or older and at a higher risk for
Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or impaired cognitive function, including
without limitation having a family history of dementia, Down Syndrome,
*JMB054*
02-27-2025 10:34:38 JMB054

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/27/25 HB1164
traumatic brain injury, or another condition that has been identified through
clinical evidence as elevating the likelihood of Alzheimer's disease,
dementia, or impaired cognitive function.
(b)(1) If a patient declines to be assessed under subsection (a) of
this section, the physician or healthcare provider shall document in the
medical records of the patient that he or she was not assessed based upon the
refusal of the patient.
(2) The record of a patient's refusal under subdivision b)(1) of
this section relieves the physician or healthcare provider of liability under
this subsection.
(c) Records, reports, data, or other information collected or
maintained under this section that identify or could be used to identify an
individual patient, healthcare provider, or institution are confidential and
are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §
25-19-101 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Cognitive Assessments

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Health benefit plan” means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan or a
policy or contract for healthcare services issued or delivered by a
healthcare insurer; and
(ii) Any health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, or
any successor program.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A disability income plan;
02-27-2025 10:34:38 JMB054

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/27/25 HB1164
(ii) A credit insurance plan;
(iii) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(iv) A medical payment under automobile or
homeowners insurance plans;
(v) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vi) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(vii) An accident-only plan;
(viii) A specified disease plan;
(ix) A long-term-care-only plan;
(x) A dental-only plan; or
(xi) A vision-only plan;
(2) “Healthcare insurer” means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a health
maintenance organization, a hospital medical service corporation, a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state, or the Arkansas Medicaid
Program; and
(3) “Healthcare provider” means a person who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
health care in the ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession,
excluding individuals whose practice does not involve direct care relevant to
Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or impaired cognitive function.

23-79-2902. Coverage for cognitive assessment.
(a) A healthcare insurer that offers, issues, or renews a health
benefit plan in this state shall provide coverage for assessment for
cognitive function, Alzheimer's disease, or dementia for a patient who is:
(1) Sixty (60) years of age or older; or
(2) Forty-five (45) years or older and at a higher risk for
Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or impaired cognitive function, including
without limitation having a family history of dementia, Down Syndrome,
02-27-2025 10:34:38 JMB054

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/27/25 HB1164
traumatic brain injury, or another condition that has been identified through
clinical evidence as elevating the likelihood of Alzheimer's disease,
dementia, or impaired cognitive function.

(b) The coverage for assessment under this section does not diminish or
limit benefits otherwise allowable under a health benefit plan.
(c) Coverage provided for assessment under subsection (a) of this
section for a self-insured government plan is subject to any health benefit
plan provisions that apply to other services covered by the health benefit
plan.
(d) Coverage for an assessment under subsection (a) of this section
shall be available only one (1) time annually.

SECTION 3. Effective Date.
The requirement in § 23-79-2902 of providing coverage for assessment of
cognitive function, Alzheimer's disease, or dementia is effective on and
after January 1, 2026.

/s/J. Mayberry

















02-27-2025 10:34:38 JMB054